Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.52.360

Ceremonial certificates of election to officers elected in single county or less.

Immediately after the ascertainment of the result of an election for an office to be filled by the voters of a single county, or of a precinct, or of a constituency within a county for which the county auditor serves as supervisor of elections, the county auditor shall notify the person elected, and issue to the person a ceremonial certificate of election.

[ 2007 c 374 s 2; 2003 c 111 s 1314; 1965 c 9 s 29.27.100. Prior: 1961 c 130 s 8; prior: Code 1881 s 3096, part; 1866 p 6 s 2, part; 1865 p 39 s 7, part; RRS s 5343, part. Formerly RCW 29.27.100.]